Maryland, session 2025, HB0044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
5–203.
(a) (1) This subsection does not apply to a candidate for:
(i) President or Vice President of the United States; or
(ii) any federal office who seeks nomination by petition.
(2) Unless the individual is a registered voter affiliated with the political
party, an individual may not be a candidate for:
(i) an office of that political party; or
(ii) except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, nomination
by that political party.
(b) The requirements for party affiliation specified under subsection (a) of this
section do not apply to a candidate for[:
(1) a judicial office; or
(2)] a county board of education.
5–703.
(a) Except for a candidate for a nonpartisan county board of education OR A
CANDIDATE FOR CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE, this section applies to any candidate for public
office subject to this title.
(b) A candidate for a public office may be nominated by petition under this
subtitle if the candidate is not affiliated with any political party.
5–703.1.
(a) Except for a candidate for a nonpartisan county board of education OR A
CANDIDATE FOR CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE, this section applies to any candidate for public
office subject to this title.

HOUSE BILL 44 3
(b) A candidate for a public office may be nominated by a political party under
this subtitle if the political party is not required to nominate its candidates by party
primary.
5–706.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a candidate selected by a political party to fill a vacancy in nomination
under Subtitle 9 or Subtitle 10 of this title; or
(2) a candidate defeated in a presidential preference primary.
(b) (1) [Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the] THE name of
a candidate who is defeated for the nomination for a public office may not appear on the
ballot at the next succeeding general election as a candidate for any office.
(2) A candidate who is defeated for the nomination for a public office may
not file a certificate of candidacy as a write–in candidate at the next succeeding general
election as a candidate for any office.
[(c) The name of a candidate for the office of judge of the circuit court who is
defeated in the primary election in each contest for the office of circuit court judge in which
the candidate appears on the ballot may not appear on the ballot at the succeeding general
election as a candidate for any office.]
SUBTITLE 9. CIRCUIT COURT JUDGES.
8–901.
EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE AND IN ARTICLE IV OF
THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION, THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE RELATING TO
THE NOMINATION AND ELECTION OF CANDIDATES TO PUBLIC OFFICE SHALL
GOVERN THE NOMINATION AND ELECTION OF CIRCUIT COURT JUDGES.
8–902.
(A) (1) CIRCUIT COURT JUDGES SHALL BE ELECTED ON A NONPARTISAN
BASIS.
(2) IN A PRIMARY ELECTION TO NOMINATE CANDIDATES FOR CIRCUIT
COURT JUDGE, ANY REGISTERED VOTER OF THE COUNTY, REGARDLESS OF PARTY
AFFILIATION OR LACK OF PARTY AFFILIATION, IS ELIGIBLE TO VOTE.

HOUSE BILL 44
(B) CANDIDATES FOR ELECTION AS A CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE SHALL,
WITHOUT PARTY DESIGNATION OR REGARD TO PARTY AFFILIATION:
(1) FILE CERTIFICATES OF CANDIDACY;
(2) BE CERTIFIED TO BE ON THE BALLOT;
(3) APPEAR ON THE BALLOT;
(4) BE VOTED ON; AND
(5) BE NOMINATED AND ELECTED.
8–903.
(A) IN EACH YEAR THAT ONE OR MORE CIRCUIT COURT JUDGES ARE TO BE
ELECTED, CANDIDATES SHALL BE NOMINATED AT THE PRIMARY ELECTION.
(B) (1) IF A CANDIDATE DIES OR BECOMES DISQUALIFIED BEFORE THE
BALLOTS ARE PRINTED, OR AT A TIME WHEN BALLOTS CAN BE REPRINTED, THE
NAME OF THE CANDIDATE MAY NOT APPEAR ON THE BALLOT.
(2) IF A CANDIDATE DIES OR BECOMES DISQUALIFIED AFTER THE
BALLOTS ARE PRINTED AND AT A TIME THAT IS TOO LATE FOR THE BALLOTS TO BE
REPRINTED, ANY VOTES CAST FOR THAT CANDIDATE MAY NOT BE COUNTED.
(C) (1) THE CANDIDATES EQUAL IN NUMBER TO TWICE THE NUMBER OF
OFFICES TO BE FILLED WHO RECEIVE THE LARGEST NUMBER OF VOTES IN THE
PRIMARY ELECTION SHALL BE THE NOMINATED CANDIDATES.
(2) IF TWO OR MORE CANDIDATES EACH RECEIVE THE LOWEST
NUMBER OF VOTES NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR NOMINATION, CREATING A TIE FOR
THE LAST NOMINATION FOR THE OFFICE TO BE FILLED, EACH SHALL BE A
NOMINATED CANDIDATE.
8–904.
(A) (1) IF, AFTER THE PRIMARY ELECTION BUT BEFORE THE GENERAL
ELECTION, A NOMINEE DIES, DECLINES THE NOMINATION, OR BECOMES
DISQUALIFIED BEFORE THE BALLOTS ARE PRINTED OR AT A TIME WHEN THE
BALLOTS CAN BE REPRINTED, THE NAME OF THE NOMINEE MAY NOT APPEAR ON THE
BALLOT.

HOUSE BILL 44 5
(2) IF THE NUMBER OF REMAINING NOMINEES IS LESS THAN THE
NUMBER OF OFFICES TO BE FILLED, THE OFFICE SHALL BE DEEMED VACANT AND
SHALL BE FILLED AS IF THE VACANCY OCCURRED DURING THE TERM OF OFFICE.
(B) IF A NOMINEE DIES, DECLINES THE NOMINATION, OR IS DISQUALIFIED
AFTER THE BALLOTS ARE PRINTED AND AT A TIME THAT IS TOO LATE FOR THE
BALLOTS TO BE REPRINTED, AND IF THAT NOMINEE RECEIVES SUFFICIENT VOTES
TO HAVE BEEN ELECTED, THE OFFICE SHALL BE DEEMED VACANT AND SHALL BE
FILLED AS IF THE VACANCY OCCURRED DURING THE TERM OF OFFICE.
8–905.
(A) IN A GENERAL ELECTION FOR CIRCUIT COURT JUDGE, A VOTER MAY
VOTE FOR A NUMBER OF NOMINEES EQUAL TO THE NUMBER OF CIRCUIT COURT
JUDGES TO BE ELECTED.
(B) (1) THE NOMINEES EQUAL IN NUMBER TO THE NUMBER OF OFFICES
TO BE FILLED WHO RECEIVE THE LARGEST NUMBER OF VOTES IN A GENERAL
ELECTION SHALL BE DECLARED ELECTED.
(2) IF TWO OR MORE NOMINEES EACH RECEIVE THE LOWEST NUMBER
OF VOTES NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR ELECTION, CREATING A TIE FOR THE LAST
OFFICE TO BE FILLED, THE OFFICE SHALL BE CONSIDERED VACANT AND SHALL BE
FILLED AS IF THE VACANCY OCCURRED DURING THE TERM OF OFFICE.
9–210.
(a) The offices to be voted on shall be arranged on the ballot in the following order,
as applicable:
(6) [judicial offices, in the following order:
(i) judge of the circuit court; and
(ii)] appellate judges, continuance in office, in the following order:
[1.] (I) Supreme Court of Maryland; and
[2.] (II) Appellate Court of Maryland;
(9) offices filled by nonpartisan election.
(g) (1) Except for contests for [judicial office or] an office to be filled by
nonpartisan election, the party affiliation of a candidate who is a nominee of a political
party shall be indicated on the ballot.

HOUSE BILL 44
(2) (i) A candidate who is not a nominee of a political party or affiliated
with a partisan organization shall be designated as an “unaffiliated”.
(ii) A candidate who is affiliated with a partisan organization shall
be designated under “other candidates”.
(3) The names of candidates for judge of the circuit court or for a county
board of education, and the names of incumbent appellate judges, shall be placed on the
ballot without a party label or other distinguishing mark or location which might indicate
party affiliation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.